Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 9.1-114.2.
Compliance with minimum training standards and reporting requirements for detector canine handlers and detector canines.

Within a period of time established by the Board, every correctional officer employed by the Department of Corrections who performs the duties of a detector canine handler shall comply with the compulsory minimum training standards for detector canine handlers, and the Department of Corrections shall ensure that any canines used at state correctional facilities are trained in accordance with the compulsory training standards established by the Board. Each state correctional facility shall submit information to the central database on the performance and effectiveness of detector canines as required by the Board. The Department shall ensure that such required training is available throughout the Commonwealth.

History.

2020, c. 535.

§ 9.1-115.
Forfeiture of office for failing to meet training standards; termination of salary and benefits; extension of term.

Every person required to comply with the training standards adopted by the Board, excluding private security services business personnel, who fails to comply with the standards within the time limits established by the regulations adopted by the Board shall forfeit his office, upon receipt of notice, as provided in subsection B. Such forfeiture shall create a vacancy in the office and all pay and allowances shall cease.

Notice shall be by certified mail, in a form approved by the Board, to the officer failing to comply and the chief administrative officer of the agency employing the officer. Notice shall be mailed to the State Compensation Board, if approval of that Board of the necessity of his office or compensation is required by law.

If the necessity for the officer or compensation of the officer is required by law to be approved by the State Compensation Board, that Board, upon receipt of notice as provided in subsection B, shall notify the Comptroller, who shall cause payment of his compensation to cease as of the date of receipt of the notice by the State Compensation Board of the notice.

It shall be the duty of the chief administrative officer of any agency employing a person who fails to meet the training standards to enforce the provisions of §

9.1-114

and this section. Willful failure to do so shall constitute misfeasance in office, and, in addition, upon conviction, shall constitute a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-181; 2001, c. 844.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 9.1-116.
Exemptions of certain persons from certain training requirements.

The Director of the Department, with the approval of the Board, may exempt a chief of police or any law-enforcement officer or any courthouse and courtroom security officer, jail officer, dispatcher, process server, or custodial officer or corrections officer of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision who has demonstrated sensitivity to cultural diversity issues and had previous experience and training as a law-enforcement officer, courthouse and courtroom security officer, jail officer, dispatcher, process server or custodial officer or corrections officer with any law-enforcement or custodial agency, from the mandatory attendance of any or all courses which are required for the successful completion of the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board.

The Director and Board shall exempt a law-enforcement officer who has demonstrated sensitivity to cultural diversity issues, had previous experience and training as a law-enforcement officer, is currently receiving or is eligible to receive a service retirement allowance in accordance with §

51.1-155

, and has a break in service of no longer than 60 calendar months between retirement and such new employment as a law-enforcement officer from the mandatory attendance of all courses that are required for the successful completion of the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board.

The exemption authorized by this section shall be available to all law-enforcement officers, courthouse and courtroom security officers, jail officer, dispatchers, process servers and custodial officers, and corrections officers, regardless of any officer’s date of initial employment, and shall entitle the officer when exempted from mandatory attendance to be deemed in compliance with the compulsory minimum training standards and eligible for the minimum salary established pursuant to Article 3 (§

15.2-1609

et seq.) of Chapter 16 of Title 15.2, provided that the officer is otherwise qualified.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-173; 1984, c. 515; 1988, c. 138; 2001, cc. 162, 844; 2022, c. 704.

Cross references.

As to waiver of law-enforcement certification examination requirement, see §

15.2-1706

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 162 amended former § 9-173, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, c. 162 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2001 amendment by c. 162 inserted “demonstrated sensitivity to cultural diversity issues and” in the first sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 704, added the second paragraph.

§ 9.1-116.1.
Virginia Sexual and Domestic Violence Victim Fund; purpose; guidelines.

There is created the Virginia Sexual and Domestic Violence Victim Fund as a special nonreverting fund to be administered by the Department of Criminal Justice Services to support the prosecution of domestic violence cases and victim services.

The Department shall adopt guidelines, the purpose of which shall be to make funds available to (i) local attorneys for the Commonwealth for the purpose of funding the cost of additional attorneys or to further dedicate existing resources to prosecute felonies and misdemeanors involving domestic violence, sexual violence, sexual abuse, stalking, and family abuse; (ii) law-enforcement authorities or appropriate programs, including civil legal assistance, to assist in protecting and providing necessary services to victims of and children affected by domestic violence, sexual abuse, stalking, and family abuse; and (iii) sexual assault service providers and hospitals for the purpose of funding the cost of salaries and equipment for sexual assault forensic examiners, sexual assault nurse examiners, and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiners, with priority for funding such costs given to such forensic examiners and nurse examiners serving rural or underserved areas of the Commonwealth.

A portion of the sum collected pursuant to § 16.1-69.48:1 as specified in that section shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of this Fund in addition to any other moneys appropriated, allocated or received specifically for such purpose. The Fund shall be distributed according to grant procedures adopted pursuant to this section and shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Any funds remaining in such Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.

The Department shall establish a grant procedure to govern funds awarded for this purpose.

History.

2004, c. 375; 2006, c. 288; 2022, c. 210.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 375, cl. 2, provides: “The Department of Criminal Justice Services, in cooperation with the Statewide Facilitator for Victims of Domestic Violence within the Office of the Attorney General, shall make all reasonable efforts to secure federal funds or other grant monies that may be made available for programs consistent with the purposes delineated in §

9.1-116.1

.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 288 inserted “Sexual and” in the section heading and in subsection A; and inserted “sexual violence” in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 210 added clause (iii) in subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

§ 9.1-116.2.
Advisory Committee on Sexual and Domestic Violence; membership; terms; compensation and expenses; duties.

The Advisory Committee on Sexual and Domestic Violence (the Advisory Committee) is established as an advisory committee in the executive branch of state government. The Advisory Committee shall have the responsibility for advising and assisting the Board, the Department, all agencies, departments, boards, and institutions of the Commonwealth, and units of local government, or combinations thereof, on matters related to the prevention and reduction of sexual and domestic violence in the Commonwealth, and to promote the efficient administration of grant funds to state and local programs that work in these areas.The Advisory Committee shall have a total of 19 members consisting of the following, or their designees: the Commissioner of Social Services; the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services; the Commissioner of Health; the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development; the Executive Director of the Virginia sexual and domestic violence coalition; the Executive Director of the Virginia Victim Assistance Network; one member of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; one member of the House of Delegates to be appointed by the Speaker of the House; the Chairman of the Virginia State Crime Commission; and the Attorney General. The membership shall also consist of nine nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be a representative of a crime victims’ organization or a victim of sexual or domestic violence and eight of whom shall be representatives of local sexual and domestic violence programs. The appointments of the nonlegislative citizen members shall include racial and ethnic diversity and shall be representative of regional and geographic locations of the Commonwealth.Legislative members and the agency directors shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. All other members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth and shall serve a term of four years. However, no member shall serve beyond the time when he holds the office or employment by reason of which he was initially eligible for appointment.The Advisory Committee shall elect its chairman and vice-chairman from among its members.

No member of the Advisory Committee appointed by the Governor shall be eligible to serve for more than two consecutive full terms.

A majority of the members of the Advisory Committee shall constitute a quorum. The Advisory Committee shall hold no less than four regular meetings a year. Subject to the requirements of this subsection, the chairman shall fix the times and places of meetings, either on his own motion or upon written request of any five members of the Advisory Committee.

The Advisory Committee may adopt bylaws for its operation.

Members of the Advisory Committee shall not receive compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of the expenses shall be provided from federal or state funds received for such purposes by the Department.

The Advisory Committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

Promote appropriate and effective responses, services, and prevention for sexual assault and domestic violence across the Commonwealth; and

Promote strong communication, coordination, and strategy at state, regional, and local levels.

The Department shall provide staff support to the Advisory Committee. Upon request, each administrative entity or collegial body within the executive branch of the state government shall cooperate with the Advisory Committee as it carries out its responsibilities.

History.

2015, cc. 222, 402; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 193.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 193, effective July 1, 2021, in the second paragraph of subsection A, substituted “19 members” for “15 members” and inserted “the Executive Director of the Virginia Victim Assistance Network” in the first sentence, and rewrote the last two sentences, which formerly read: “The membership shall also consist of six nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be a representative of a crime victims’ organization or a victim of sexual or domestic violence, one of whom shall be a member of the board of the Virginia Victim Assistance Network, and four of whom shall be directors of local sexual and domestic violence programs, of whom one shall be a director of a program that concentrates solely on domestic violence, one shall be a director of a program that concentrates solely on sexual violence, and two shall be directors of programs that work in both sexual and domestic violence. The appointments of the four directors shall be representative of regional and geographic locations of the Commonwealth”; deleted the second and third sentences in subsection B, which read: “A term of three or more years within a four-year period shall be deemed a full term. Any vacancy on the Advisory Committee shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, but for the unexpired term”; and rewrote subsection F.

§ 9.1-116.3.
Virginia Sexual and Domestic Violence Program Professional Standards Committee.

The Virginia Sexual and Domestic Violence Program Professional Standards Committee (the Committee) shall establish voluntary accreditation standards and measures by which local sexual and domestic violence programs can be systematically evaluated with a peer-reviewed process. The Committee may adopt bylaws for its operation, fees, and other items as necessary. Fees for accreditation shall be used to support any administrative costs of the Department. Upon request of the Committee, the Department and the Virginia sexual and domestic violence coalition may provide accreditation assistance and training and resource material that will assist the local programs in obtaining or retaining accreditation. The Department shall provide staff support to the Committee.The Committee shall consist of the following: one nonvoting member representing the Department of Criminal Justice Services; one nonvoting member appointed by and representative of the Department of Social Services; one nonvoting member appointed by and representative of the Virginia sexual and domestic violence coalition; and 12 nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Governor, who shall be leadership staff of local sexual and domestic violence programs. The nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Governor shall serve for terms of four years, provided that no voting member shall serve beyond the time when he holds the office or employment by reason of which he was initially eligible for appointment. Members appointed by the Governor shall not be eligible to serve for more than two consecutive terms. The appointment of members shall take into consideration racial and ethnic diversity and shall be representative of regional and geographic locations of the Commonwealth.The Committee shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its members.

A majority of the voting members of the Committee shall constitute a quorum.

Members of the Committee shall not receive compensation but shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2825

.

The Committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

Establish voluntary accreditation standards and measures by which local and domestic violence programs can be systematically evaluated with a peer-reviewed process;

Review and vote on accreditation status recommendations for applicant programs;

Establish a subcommittee as needed to address appeals from applicant programs; and

Periodically evaluate and revise accreditation standards and measures.

The Department shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

Establish accreditation procedures by which local sexual and domestic violence programs can be systematically evaluated with a peer-reviewed process;

Assist local programs in obtaining or retaining accreditation;

Review and evaluate applications for accreditation; and

Determine accreditation status recommendations for applicant programs and present such recommendations to the Committee.

History.

2015, cc. 222, 402; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 193.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 193, effective July 1, 2021, added the subsection A designation; in subsection A, in the first paragraph, substituted “measures” for “procedures” and deleted “measured and” following “systematically” in the first sentence, deleted “membership terms” following “operation” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence, rewrote the second paragraph, and added the third paragraph; and added subsections B through E.

§ 9.1-116.4.
Virginia Prevention of Sex Trafficking Fund; purpose; guidelines.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Prevention of Sex Trafficking Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys accruing to the Fund shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used for the purpose of promoting prevention and awareness of sex trafficking. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Department.

The Fund shall be administered by the Department, and the Department shall adopt guidelines to make funds available to agencies of the state and local governments for the purpose of promoting awareness of and preventative training and education related to sex trafficking.

History.

2019, c. 728.

§ 9.1-116.5.
Sex Trafficking Response Coordinator; duties; report.

There is established within the Department a Sex Trafficking Response Coordinator (the Coordinator). The Coordinator shall:

Create a statewide plan for local and state agencies to identify and respond to victims of sex trafficking;

Coordinate the development of standards and guidelines for treatment programs for victims of sex trafficking;

Maintain a list of programs that provide treatment or specialized services to victims of sex trafficking and make such list available to law-enforcement agencies, attorneys for the Commonwealth, crime victim and witness assistance programs, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Social Services, the Department of Education, and school divisions;

Oversee the development of a curriculum to be completed by persons convicted of solicitation of prostitution under §

18.2-346.01

; and

Promote strategies for the education, training, and awareness of sex trafficking and for the reduction of demand for commercial sex.

The Coordinator may request and shall receive from every department, division, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency created by the Commonwealth, or to which the Commonwealth is a party or any political subdivision thereof, cooperation and assistance in the performance of its duties. The Coordinator may also consult and exchange information with local government agencies and interested stakeholders.

The Coordinator shall report annually on or before October 1 to the Governor and the General Assembly. The report shall include a summary of activities for the year and any recommendations to address sex trafficking within the Commonwealth. The Department shall ensure that such report is available to the public.

History.

2019, cc. 486, 514; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 188.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in Acts 2019, cc. 486 and 514 having been

9.1-116.4

.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 188, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “§

18.2-346.01

” for “subsection B of §

18.2-346

” in subdivision A 4.

§ 9.1-116.6.
Virginia Gun Violence Intervention and Prevention Fund; purpose; guidelines.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Gun Violence Intervention and Prevention Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys accruing to the Fund, including funds appropriated for such purpose and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used for the purpose of supporting gun violence intervention and prevention programs. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Department.

The Fund shall be administered by the Department, and the Department shall adopt guidelines to make funds available to agencies of local government, community-based organizations, and hospitals for the purpose of supporting implementation of evidence-informed gun violence intervention and prevention efforts, including street outreach, hospital-based violence intervention, and group violence intervention programs.

The Department shall establish a grant procedure to govern funds awarded for this purpose.

History.

2020, cc. 818, 1129.

§ 9.1-116.7.
(Expires July 1, 2023) Body-Worn Camera System Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Body-Worn Camera System Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds appropriated for such purpose and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of assisting state or local law-enforcement agencies with the costs of purchasing, operating, and maintaining body-worn camera systems as defined in §

15.2-1723.1

. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Department.

The Fund shall be administered by the Department, and the Department shall adopt guidelines to make funds available to state or local law-enforcement agencies for the purpose of assisting state or local law-enforcement agencies with the costs of purchasing, operating, and maintaining body-worn camera systems as defined in §

15.2-1723.1

.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 335.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 335, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2023.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.